Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.027

Eligible for commitment regardless of cause.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

When a designated crisis responder or a professional person has determined that a person has a mental disorder, and is otherwise committable, the cause of the person's mental disorder shall not make the person ineligible for commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 407; 2004 c 166 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2016 sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 71.05.760.

Short title—Right of action—2016 sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.

Severability—Effective dates—2004 c 166: See notes following RCW 71.05.040.